New York, session 2025-2026, A11607.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public housing law is amended by adding a new section 2 402-i to read as follows: 3 § 402-i. Investigation and removal of squatters. 1. Within twenty-four 4 hours of receiving a complaint of a squatter, as described in section 5 seven hundred eleven of the real property actions and proceedings law, 6 in a New York city housing authority apartment, the authority shall 7 investigate such complaint. 8 2. Where a squatter is found to be occupying a New York city housing 9 authority apartment, the authority shall utilize the most expedient 10 legal means of removing such squatter from such apartment. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 12 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD16049-01-6